src/fst/affixes/numerals.lexc
!:%{back%}     NMN_15KOTUS/ILVES-SG ;
!LEXICON NUM_15KOTUS_PL
!:%{back%}     NMN_15KOTUS/ILVES_PL ;


!LEXICON NUM_16INEMINE !!= @CODE@
!! inemine:inemi
! Gradation: No
!! * Yaml: **N-inemine16**
!	N_16INEMINE-SG ;
!	N_16INEMINE_PL ;
!LEXICON NUM_16INEMINE-SG
!:%{front%}	NMN_16ABILINW/INEMINE-SG ;
!LEXICON NUM_16INEMINE_PL
!:%{front%}	NMN_16ABILINW/INEMINE_PL ;

!LEXICON NUM_16ABILINW !!= @CODE@
!! abilinõ:abili
! Gradation: No
!! * Yaml: **N-abilinw16**
!	N_16ABILINW-SG ;
!	N_16ABILINW_PL ;
!LEXICON NUM_16ABILINW-SG
!:%{back%}	NMN_16ABILINW/INEMINE-SG ;
!LEXICON NUM_16ABILINW_PL
!:%{back%}	NMN_16ABILINW/INEMINE_PL ;

!LEXICON NUM_18AIVASTUS
!        NUM_18AIVASTUS-SG ;
!        NUM_18AIVASTUS_PL ;
!LEXICON NUM_18AIVASTUS-SG
!:%{back%}     NMN_18AIVASTUS/EHITUES-SG ;
!LEXICON NUM_18AIVASTUS_PL
!:%{back%}     NMN_18AIVASTUS/EHITUES_PL ;


!LEXICON NUM_18EHITUES
!        NUM_18EHITUES-SG ;
!        NUM_18EHITUES_PL ;
!LEXICON NUM_18EHITUES-SG
!:%{front%}     NMN_18AIVASTUS/EHITUES-SG ;
!LEXICON NUM_18EHITUES_PL
!:%{front%}     NMN_18AIVASTUS/EHITUES_PL ;

!LEXICON NUM_19ALOMANW !!= @CODE@ alomanõ:aloma
! Gradation: No
!        NUM_19ALOMANW-SG ;
!        NUM_19ALOMANW_PL ;
!LEXICON NUM_19ALOMANW-SG
!:%{back%}     NMN_19ALOMANW/PEDAEJAENE-SG ;
!LEXICON NUM_19ALOMANW_PL
!:%{back%}     NMN_19ALOMANW/PEDAEJAENE_PL ;

!LEXICON NUM_19PEDAEJAENE !!= @CODE@ pedäjäne:pedäjä
! Gradation: No
!	N_19PEDAEJAENE-SG ;
!	N_19PEDAEJAENE_PL ;
!LEXICON NUM_19PEDAEJAENE-SG
!:%{front%}	NMN_19ALOMANW/PEDAEJAENE-SG ;
!LEXICON NUM_19PEDAEJAENE_PL
!:%{front%}	NMN_19ALOMANW/PEDAEJAENE_PL ;

!LEXICON NUM_20LATS1 !!= @CODE@ latś:lats
!	N_20LATS1-SG ;
!        NUM_20LATS1_PL ;
!LEXICON NUM_20LATS1-SG
!:%{back%}     NMN_20LATS1-SG ;
!LEXICON NUM_20LATS1_PL
!:%{back%}     NMN_20LATS1_PL ;

!LEXICON NUM_20TAEUES1 !!= @CODE@ täüś:täü
!        NUM_20TAEUES1-SG ;
!	N_20TAEUES1_PL ;
!LEXICON NUM_20TAEUES1-SG
!:%{front%}     NMN_20TAEUES1-SG ;
!LEXICON NUM_20TAEUES1_PL
!:%{front%}     NMN_20TAEUES1_PL ;

!LEXICON NUM_20VAEITS1 !!= @CODE@ väitś:väits
!        NUM_20VAEITS1-SG ;
!	N_20VAEITS1_PL ;
!LEXICON NUM_20VAEITS1-SG
!:%{front%}     NMN_20VAEITS1-SG ;
!LEXICON NUM_20VAEITS1_PL
!:%{front%}     NMN_20VAEITS1_PL ;

!LEXICON NUM_20KUEUEDS1 !!= @CODE@ küüdś:küüds
!	N_20KUEUEDS1-SG ;
!        NUM_20KUEUEDS1_PL ;
!LEXICON NUM_20KUEUEDS1-SG
!:%{front%}     NMN_20KUEUEDS1-SG ;
!LEXICON NUM_20KUEUEDS1_PL
!:%{front%}     NMN_20KUEUEDS1_PL ;

!LEXICON NUM_20MIIS1
!	N_20MIIS1-SG ;
!        NUM_20MIIS1_PL ;
!LEXICON NUM_20MIIS1-SG
!:%{front%}     NMN_20MIIS1-SG ;
!LEXICON NUM_20MIIS1_PL
!:%{front%}     NMN_20MIIS1_PL ;


!LEXICON NUM_21HUEDSI !!= @CODE@ hüdsi:hüdsi
!	N_21HUEDSI-SG ;
!        NUM_21HUEDSI_PL ;
!LEXICON NUM_21HUEDSI-SG
!:%{front%}     NMN_21HUEDSI-SG ;
!LEXICON NUM_21HUEDSI_PL
!:%{front%}     NMN_21HUEDSI_PL ;

LEXICON NUM_22VWROKWNW !!= @CODE@ võrokõnõ:võrokõ
! Gradation: No
        NUM_22VWROKWNW-SG ;
	NUM_22VWROKWNW_PL ;
LEXICON NUM_22VWROKWNW-SG
:%{back%}     NMN_22VWROKWNW/VAEHAEKENE-SG ;
LEXICON NUM_22VWROKWNW_PL
:%{back%}     NMN_22VWROKWNW/VAEHAEKENE_PL ;

LEXICON NUM_22NAANW !!= @CODE@ naanõ:naa
! Gradation: No
        NUM_22NAANW-SG ;
        NUM_22NAANW_PL ;
LEXICON NUM_22NAANW-SG
:%{back%}     NMN_22NAANW-SG ;
